California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) The sale shall be made at auction to the highest bidder.

(c) If personal property capable of manual delivery is to be sold, it shall be within the view of those who attend the sale unless, upon application of the judgment creditor or the judgment debtor, the court orders otherwise.

(d) Property shall be sold separately or in such groups or lots as are likely to bring the highest price. The judgment debtor may request that the property be sold separately or together and may request that the property be sold in a particular order. If the judgment debtor is not present at the sale, the request may be made in writing and delivered to the levying officer prior to the sale. The levying officer shall honor the request if, in the opinion of the levying officer, the requested manner of sale is likely to yield an amount at least equal to any other manner of sale or the amount required to satisfy the money judgment. The levying officer is not liable for a decision made in good faith under this
 subdivision.

(e) After sufficient property has been sold to yield the amount required to satisfy the money judgment, no more shall be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.580.

The judgment debtor and judgment creditor together may request in writing that a sale be postponed to an agreed day and hour. The request shall be delivered to the levying officer conducting the sale, and the levying officer shall, by public declaration at the time and place originally fixed for the sale, postpone the sale to the day and hour fixed in the request. Notice of any additional postponements shall be given by public declaration by the levying officer at the time and place last appointed for the sale. No other notice of postponed sale need be given. A postponed sale shall be held at the place originally fixed for the
 sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.590.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the purchaser at a sale shall pay in cash or by certified check or cashier’s check.

(b) The judgment creditor may bid by giving the levying officer a written receipt crediting all or part of the amount required to satisfy the judgment, except that the levying officer’s costs remaining unsatisfied and the amount of preferred labor claims, exempt proceeds, and any other claim that is required by statute to be satisfied, shall be paid in cash or by certified check or cashier’s check.

(c) If the highest bid for an interest in real property sold exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the highest bidder may elect to treat the sale as a credit transaction. A person who makes the election shall deposit at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) or 10 percent of the amount bid, whichever is greater, and within 10 days after the date of the sale shall pay the balance due plus costs accruing with regard to the property sold and interest accruing at the rate on money judgments on the balance of the amount bid from the date of sale until the date of payment.

(d) If the highest bid for an item, group, or lot of personal property sold exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the highest bidder may elect to treat the sale as a credit transaction. A person who makes the election shall deposit at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or 10 percent of the
 amount bid, whichever is greater, and within 10 days after the date of the sale shall pay the balance due plus costs accruing with regard to the property sold and interest accruing at the rate on money judgments on the balance of the amount bid from the date of sale until the date of payment.

(e) A person who makes the election under subdivision (c) or (d) is not entitled to possession of the property sold until the amount bid, plus accruing costs and interest, have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.600.

If the highest bidder does not pay the amount bid as prescribed by Section 701.590:

(a) The levying officer shall sell the property:

(1) If the default occurs at the sale, either to the next highest bidder at the amount of the next highest bid if such bidder agrees or to the highest bidder at a new sale held immediately.

(2) If the default occurs after the sale to a credit bidder pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 701.590, to the highest bidder at a new
 sale.

(b) The levying officer shall apply the amount of any deposit made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 701.590 in the following order:

(1) To the satisfaction of costs accruing with regard to the property sold from the date of the sale until the date the property is resold, including costs of resale.

(2) To the satisfaction of interest at the rate on money judgments on the amount bid from the date of the sale until the date the property is resold.

(3) To the amount required to satisfy the money judgment in the order of distribution prescribed by Section 701.810 or Section 704.850, whichever is applicable.

(c) If there is a sale to the next highest bidder or to the highest bidder
 at a new sale, the defaulting bidder is liable for the following amounts in an action by the judgment creditor or judgment debtor:

(1) The amount bid, less the amount obtained from the resale of the property and the amount of any deposit applied pursuant to subdivision (b). The amount recovered pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed in the manner prescribed by Section 701.810 or Section 704.850, whichever is applicable.

(2) Any costs accruing with regard to the property sold from the date of sale until the date the property is resold, including costs of resale.

(3) Interest at the rate on money judgments on the amount bid from the date of the sale until the date the property is resold.

(4) Costs and attorney’s fees incurred in the action under
 this subdivision. 

(d) The levying officer may, in the levying officer’s discretion, reject any subsequent bid of the defaulting bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.610.

The levying officer may not be a purchaser or have an interest in any purchase at a sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.620.

(a) Property may not be sold unless the amount bid exceeds the total of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of all preferred labor claims that are required by Section 1206 to be satisfied from the proceeds.

(2) The amount of any state tax lien (as defined in Section 7162 of the Government Code) that is superior to the judgment creditor’s lien.

(3) If the purchaser is not the judgment creditor, the amount of any deposit made pursuant
 to Section 720.260 with interest thereon at the rate on money judgments from the date of the deposit to the date of the sale.

(b) Property for which a proceeds exemption is provided by Section 704.010 (motor vehicle), 704.020 (household furnishings and other personal effects), or 704.060 (tools of trade), may not be sold unless the amount bid exceeds the sum of any amount under subdivision (a) and the amount of the proceeds exemption. 

(c) If a minimum bid required for the sale of property pursuant to this section is not received, the levying officer shall promptly release the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.630.

If property is sold pursuant to this article, the lien under which it is sold, any liens subordinate thereto, and any state tax lien (as defined in Section 7162 of the Government Code) on the property sold are extinguished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.640.

The purchaser of property at an execution sale acquires any interest of the judgment debtor in the property sold (1) that is held on the effective date of the lien under which the property was sold or (2) that is acquired between such effective date and the date of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.650.

(a) When the purchaser of personal property pays the amount due:

(1) If the property is capable of manual delivery, the levying officer shall deliver the property to the purchaser and, if the purchaser so requests, shall execute and deliver a certificate of sale to the purchaser.

(2) If the property is not tangible personal property or if it is otherwise not capable of manual delivery, the levying officer shall execute and deliver a certificate of sale to the purchaser.

(b) If property or a certificate is delivered pursuant to subdivision (a), the levying officer shall sign or endorse any document or instrument in the levying officer’s possession relating to the title to or the right to possession of the property and deliver it to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.660.

When the purchaser of an interest in real property pays the amount due to the levying officer, including any amount required to be paid as a documentary transfer tax pursuant to Section 11911 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the levying officer conducting the sale shall execute and deliver a deed of sale to the purchaser, record a duplicate of the deed of sale in the office of the county recorder, and forward to the
 county or city and county any documentary transfer tax paid by the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 11.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

701.670.

The certificate of sale or deed of sale shall contain all of the following:

(a) The title of the court where the judgment was entered under which the sale was made and the cause and number of the action.

(b) The date of entry of the judgment and of any subsequent renewals and where entered in the records of the court.

(c) The name and address of the judgment creditor and the name and last known address of the judgment debtor.

(d) A description of the property sold.

(e) The date of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.680.

(a) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a sale of property pursuant to this article is absolute and shall not be set aside for any reason.

(b) If the judgment is reversed, vacated, or otherwise set aside, the judgment debtor may recover from the judgment creditor the proceeds of a sale pursuant to the judgment with
 interest at the rate on money judgments to the extent the proceeds were applied to the satisfaction of the judgment.

(c) If the sale was improper because of irregularities in the proceedings, because the property sold was not subject to execution, or for any other reason:

(1) The judgment debtor, or the judgment debtor’s successor in interest, may commence an action within 90 days after the date of sale to set aside the sale if the purchaser at the sale is the judgment creditor. Subject to paragraph (2), if the sale is set aside, the judgment of the judgment creditor is revived to reflect the amount that was satisfied from the proceeds of the sale and the judgment creditor is entitled to interest on the amount of the judgment as so revived as if the sale had not been made. Any liens extinguished by the sale of the property are revived and reattach to the property with the same
 priority and effect as if the sale had not been made.

(2) The judgment debtor, or the judgment debtor’s successor in interest, may recover damages caused by the impropriety. If damages are recovered against the judgment creditor, they shall be offset against the judgment to the extent the judgment is not satisfied. If damages are recovered against the levying officer, they shall be applied to the judgment to the extent the judgment is not satisfied.

(d) For the purposes of subdivision (c), the purchaser of the property at the sale is not a successor in interest.

(e) This section does not affect, limit, or eliminate a judgment debtor’s equitable right of redemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Distribution of Proceeds of Sale or Collection [701.810. - 701.830.]

701.810.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, the levying officer shall distribute the proceeds of sale or collection in the following order:

(a) To persons having preferred labor claims that are required by Section 1206 to be satisfied from the proceeds, in the amounts required by Section 1206 to be satisfied.

(b) To the state department or agency having a state tax lien (as defined in Section 7162 of the Government Code) that is superior to the judgment creditor’s lien, in the amount of the lien.

(c) If a deposit has been made pursuant to Section 720.260 and the purchaser at the sale is not the judgment creditor, to the judgment creditor in the amount required to repay the deposit with interest thereon at the rate on money judgments from the date of the deposit.

(d) To the judgment debtor in the amount of any applicable exemption of proceeds pursuant to Section 704.010 (motor vehicle), 704.020 (household furnishings and other personal effects), or 704.060 (tools of trade), except that such proceeds shall be used to satisfy all of the following in the order of their respective priorities:

(1) Any consensual liens and encumbrances, and any liens for labor or materials, that are subordinate to the judgment creditor’s lien.

(2) Subject to Section 688.030, any state tax lien (as defined in Section 7162 of the Government Code) on the property sold if the notice of state tax lien on the property has been recorded or filed pursuant to Section 7171 of the Government Code prior to the time the levying officer received the proceeds of the sale or collection.

(e) To the levying officer for the reimbursement of the levying officer’s costs for which an advance has not been made.

(f) To the judgment creditor to satisfy the following, in the following order:

(1) First, any costs and interest
 accruing on the judgment after issuance of the writ pursuant to which the sale or collection is conducted.

(2) Second, the principal amount due on the judgment with costs and interest, as entered on the writ.

(g) To any other judgment creditors who have delivered writs to the levying officer, accompanied by instructions to levy upon the judgment debtor’s property or the proceeds of its sale or collection, or any other persons actually known by the levying officer to have a claim, lien, or other interest subordinate to the judgment creditor’s lien that is extinguished by the sale and that is not otherwise satisfied pursuant to this section, in the amounts to which they are entitled in order of their respective priorities.

(h) To the judgment debtor in the amount remaining.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 4, Sec. 2.   (AB 680)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

701.820.

(a) Promptly after a sale or collection under this title, the levying officer shall distribute the proceeds to the persons entitled thereto or, in cases covered by Section 701.830, deposit the proceeds with the court.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by statute, the proceeds shall be paid to the persons entitled thereto within 30 days
 after the proceeds are received by the levying officer.

(c) If the proceeds are not received by the levying officer in one payment, the levying officer may accumulate proceeds received during a 30-day period and the accumulated proceeds shall be paid to the persons entitled thereto not later than 10 days after the expiration of the 30-day period.

(d) When proceeds are received by the levying officer in the form of a check or other form of noncash payment that is to be honored upon presentation by the levying officer for payment, the proceeds are not received for the purposes of this section until the check or other form of noncash payment has actually been honored upon presentation for payment.

(e) The provisions of Section 26680 of the Government Code apply to the levying officer only if all of the following
 conditions are satisfied:

(1) The levying officer has failed to pay the proceeds or deposit them with the court as provided in this article within the time provided in this section.

(2) Upon such failure, a person entitled to any of the proceeds has filed, in person or by certified mail, with the levying officer a written demand for the payment of the proceeds to the persons entitled thereto.

(3) The levying officer has failed within 10 days after the demand is filed to pay to the person filing the demand the proceeds to which that person is entitled.

(f) If all proceeds have not been received within 10 days after the filing of the demand specified by paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), a judgment creditor may file an ex parte application for an order
 directing the levying officer to show cause why relief should not be granted pursuant to Section 26680 of the Government Code. The order shall name a date and time for the levying officer to appear not less than 20 and not more than 30 days after filing of the application. If the levying officer pays all proceeds as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 701.810 to the judgment creditor no later than 10 days prior to the hearing, the judgment creditor shall notify the court of full payment no later than three days prior to the hearing and the court shall withdraw the order and vacate the hearing.

(g) An ex parte application filed pursuant to subdivision (f) shall state the date and manner of all of the following:

(1) Delivery of the writ of execution to the levying officer.

(2) Remittance of the proceeds to the
 levying officer.

(3) Filing of the 10-day demand pursuant to subdivision (e).

(h) If the court finds that the facts alleged in the ex parte application filed pursuant to subdivision (f) to be knowingly false, or made in bad faith, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney fees to the levying officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   (AB 680)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

701.830.

(a) If there are conflicting claims to all or a portion of the proceeds of sale or collection known to the levying officer before the proceeds are distributed, the levying officer may deposit with the court the proceeds that are the subject of the conflicting claims instead of distributing such proceeds under Section 701.810. Any interested person may apply on noticed motion for an order for the distribution of the proceeds deposited with the court. A copy of the notice of motion shall be served on such persons as the court shall by order determine in such manner as the court prescribes. Any interested person may request time
 for filing a response to the motion for an order for the distribution of the proceeds, for discovery proceedings in connection with the motion, or for other preparation for the hearing on the motion, and the court shall grant a continuance for a reasonable time for any of these purposes.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), at the hearing on the motion the court shall determine the issues presented by the motion and make an order for the distribution of the proceeds deposited with the court.

(c) The court shall not determine the issues presented by the motion and instead shall abate the hearing until the issues presented by the motion can be determined in a civil action in the following cases if:

(1) The court is not the proper court under any other provision of law for the trial of a civil action with respect
 to the subject matter of the motion and any interested person at or prior to the hearing objects to the determination of the issues presented by the motion by the court.

(2) A civil action is pending with respect to the subject matter of the motion and jurisdiction has been obtained in the court in which the civil action is pending.

(3) The court determines that the matter should be determined in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Exemptions [703.010. - 704.995.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [703.010. - 703.150.]

703.010.

Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(a) The exemptions provided by this chapter or by any other statute apply to all procedures for enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) The exemptions provided by this chapter or by any other statute do not apply if the judgment to be enforced is for the foreclosure of a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien or encumbrance on the property other than a lien created pursuant to this division or pursuant to Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 481.010) (attachment).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.020.

(a) The exemptions provided by this chapter apply only to property of a natural person.

(b) The exemptions provided in this chapter may be claimed by any of the following persons:

(1) In all cases, by the judgment debtor or a person acting on behalf of the judgment
 debtor.

(2) In the case of community property, by the spouse of the judgment debtor, whether or not the spouse is also a judgment debtor under the judgment.

(3) In the case of community property, by the domestic partner of the judgment debtor, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, whether or not the domestic partner is also a judgment debtor under the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   (AB 1945)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

703.030.

(a) An exemption for property that is described in this chapter or in any other statute as exempt may be claimed within the time and in the manner prescribed in the applicable enforcement procedure. If the exemption is not so claimed, the exemption is waived and the property is subject to enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, property that is described in this chapter or in any other statute as exempt without making a claim is not subject to any procedure for enforcement of a money judgment.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court pursuant to Section 473 to relieve a person upon such terms as may be just from failure to claim an exemption within the time and in the manner prescribed in the applicable enforcement procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.040.

A purported contractual or other prior waiver of the exemptions provided by this chapter or by any other statute, other than a waiver by failure to claim an exemption required to be claimed or otherwise made at the time enforcement is sought, is against public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.050.

(a) The determination whether property is exempt or the amount of an exemption shall be made by application of the exemption statutes in effect (1) at the time the judgment creditor’s lien on the property was created or (2) if the judgment creditor’s lien on the property is the latest in a series of overlapping liens created when an earlier lien on the property in favor of the judgment creditor was in effect, at the time the earliest lien in the series of overlapping liens was created.

(b) This section applies to all judgments, whether based upon tort, contract,
 or other legal theory or cause of action that arose before or after the operative date of this section, and whether the judgment was entered before or after the operative date of this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the case of a levy of execution, the procedures to be followed in levying upon, selling, or releasing property, claiming, processing, opposing, and determining exemptions, and paying exemption proceeds, shall be governed by the law in effect at the time the levy of execution is made on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.060.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that generally persons who enter into contracts do not do so in reliance on an assumption that the exemptions in effect at the time of the contract will govern enforcement of any judgment based on the contract, that liens imposed on property are imposed not as a matter of right but as a matter of privilege granted by statute for purposes of priority, that no vested rights with respect to exemptions are created by the making of a contract or imposition of a lien, that application of exemptions and exemption procedures in effect at the time of enforcement of a judgment is essential to the
 proper balance between the rights of judgment debtors and judgment creditors and has a minimal effect on the economic stability essential for the maintenance of private and public faith in commercial matters, and that it is the policy of the state to treat all judgment debtors equally with respect to exemptions and exemption procedures in effect at the time of enforcement of a money judgment. To this end, the Legislature reserves the right to repeal, alter, or add to the exemptions and the procedures therefor at any time and intends, unless otherwise provided by statute, that any repeals, alterations, or additions apply upon their operative date to enforcement of all money judgments, whether based upon tort, contract, or other legal theory or cause of action that arose before or after the operative date of the repeals, alterations, or additions, whether the judgment was entered before or after the operative date of the repeals, alterations, or additions.

(b) All contracts shall be deemed to have been made and all liens on property shall be deemed to have been created in recognition of the power of the state to repeal, alter, and add to statutes providing for liens and exemptions from the enforcement of money judgments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.070.

Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(a) The exemptions provided by this chapter or by any other statute apply to a judgment for child, family, or spousal support.

(b) If property is exempt without making a claim, the property is not subject to being applied to the satisfaction of a judgment for child, family, or spousal support.

(c) Except as provided in
 subdivision (b), if property sought to be applied to the satisfaction of a judgment for child, family, or spousal support is shown to be exempt under subdivision (a) in appropriate proceedings, the court shall, upon noticed motion of the judgment creditor, determine the extent to which the exempt property nevertheless shall be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment. In making this determination, the court shall take into account the needs of the judgment creditor, the needs of the judgment debtor and all the persons the judgment debtor is required to support, and all other relevant circumstances. The court shall effectuate its determination by an order specifying the extent to which the otherwise exempt property is to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

703.080.

(a) Subject to any limitation provided in the particular exemption, a fund that is exempt remains exempt to the extent that it can be traced into deposit accounts or in the form of cash or its equivalent.

(b) The exemption claimant has the burden of tracing an exempt fund.

(c) The tracing of exempt funds in a deposit account shall be by application of the lowest intermediate balance principle unless the exemption claimant or the judgment creditor shows that some other method of tracing would better
 serve the interests of justice and equity under the circumstances of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.090.

If a judgment creditor has failed to oppose a claim of exemption within the time allowed by Section 703.550 or if property has been determined by a court to be exempt, and the judgment creditor thereafter levies upon or otherwise seeks to apply the property toward the satisfaction of the same money judgment, the judgment creditor is not entitled to recover the subsequent costs of collection unless the property is applied to satisfaction of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.100.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the determination whether property is exempt shall be made under the circumstances existing at the earliest of the following times:

(1) The time of levy on the property.

(2) The time of the commencement of court proceedings for the application of the property to the satisfaction of the money judgment.

(3) The time a lien is created under Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 481.010) (attachment) or under
 this title.

(b) The court, in its discretion, may take into consideration any of the following changes that have occurred between the time of levy or commencement of enforcement proceedings or creation of the lien and the time of the hearing:

(1) A change in the use of the property if the exemption is based upon the use of property and if the property was used for the exempt purpose at the time of the levy or the commencement of enforcement proceedings or the creation of the lien but is used for a nonexempt purpose at the time of the hearing.

(2) A change in the value of the property if the exemption is based upon the value of property.

(3) A change in the financial circumstances of the judgment debtor and spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor if
 the exemption is based upon their needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.110.

If the judgment debtor is married:

(a) The exemptions provided by this chapter or by any other statute apply to all property that is subject to enforcement of a money judgment, including the interest of the spouse of the judgment debtor in community property. The fact that one or both spouses are judgment debtors under the judgment or that property sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment is separate or community does not increase or reduce the number or amount of the exemptions. Where the property exempt under a particular exemption is
 limited to a specified maximum dollar amount, unless the exemption provision specifically provides otherwise, the two spouses together are entitled to one exemption limited to the specified maximum dollar amount, whether one or both of the spouses are judgment debtors under the judgment and whether the property sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment is separate or community.

(b) If an exemption is required by statute to be applied first to property not before the court and then to property before the court, the application of the exemption to property not before the court shall be made to the community property and separate property of both spouses, whether or not such property is subject to enforcement of the money judgment.

(c) If the same exemption is claimed by the judgment debtor and the spouse of the judgment debtor for different property, and the property
 claimed by one spouse, but not both, is exempt, the exemption shall be applied as the spouses agree. If the spouses are unable to agree, the exemption shall be applied as directed by the court in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 14.7.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

703.115.

In determining an exemption based upon the needs of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor or an exemption based upon the needs of the judgment debtor and the family of the judgment debtor, the court shall take into account all property of the judgment debtor and, to the extent the judgment debtor has a spouse and dependents or family, all property of such spouse and dependents or family, including community property and separate property of the spouse, whether or not such property is subject to enforcement of the money judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 15.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

703.130.

Pursuant to the authority of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 522 of Title 11 of the United States Code, the exemptions set forth in subsection (d) of Section 522 of Title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy) are not authorized in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 14.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

703.140.

(a) In a case under Title 11 of the United States Code, all of the exemptions provided by this chapter, including the homestead exemption, other than the provisions of subdivision (b) are applicable regardless of whether there is a money judgment against the debtor or whether a money judgment is being enforced by execution sale or any other procedure, but the exemptions provided by subdivision (b) may be elected in lieu of all other exemptions provided by this chapter, as follows:

(1) If spouses are joined in the petition, they jointly may elect to utilize the applicable exemption provisions of this chapter other than the provisions of subdivision (b), or to utilize the applicable exemptions set forth in subdivision (b), but not both.

(2) (A) If the petition is filed individually, and not jointly, for a spouse, the exemptions provided by this chapter other than the provisions of subdivision (b) are applicable, except that, if both of the spouses effectively waive in writing the right to claim, during the period the case commenced by filing the petition is pending, the exemptions provided by the applicable exemption provisions of this chapter, other than subdivision (b), in any case commenced by filing a petition for either of them under Title 11 of the United States Code, then they may elect to instead utilize the applicable exemptions set forth in subdivision (b).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a
 waiver is not required from a debtor who is living separate and apart from their spouse as of the date the petition commencing the case under Title 11 of the United States Code is filed, unless, on the petition date, the debtor and the debtor’s spouse shared an ownership interest in property that could be exempted as a homestead under Article 4 of this chapter.

(3) If the petition is filed for an unmarried person, that person may elect to utilize the applicable exemption provisions of this chapter other than subdivision (b), or to utilize the applicable exemptions set forth in subdivision (b), but not both.

(b) The following exemptions may be elected as provided in subdivision (a):

(1) The debtor’s aggregate interest, not to exceed twenty-nine thousand two hundred seventy-five dollars
 ($29,275) in value, in real property or personal property that the debtor or a dependent of the debtor uses as a residence, in a cooperative that owns property that the debtor or a dependent of the debtor uses as a residence.

(2) The debtor’s interest, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
 ($7,500)
 in value, in one or more motor vehicles.

(3) The debtor’s interest, not to exceed seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($725) in value in any particular item, in household furnishings, household goods, wearing apparel, appliances, books, animals, crops, or musical instruments, that are held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor.

(4) The debtor’s aggregate interest, not to exceed one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750) in value, in jewelry held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor.

(5) The debtor’s aggregate interest, not to exceed one thousand five hundred fifty dollars ($1,550) in value, plus any unused amount of the exemption provided under paragraph (1), in any property.

(6) The debtor’s aggregate interest, not to exceed eight thousand seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,725) in value, in any implements, professional books, or tools of the trade of the debtor or the trade of a dependent of the debtor.

(7) Any unmatured life insurance contract owned by the debtor, other than a credit life insurance contract.

(8) The debtor’s aggregate interest, not to exceed fifteen thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($15,650) in value, in any accrued dividend or interest under, or loan value of, any unmatured life insurance contract owned by the debtor under which the insured is the debtor or an individual of whom the debtor is a dependent.

(9) Professionally prescribed health aids for the
 debtor, the debtor’s spouse, or a dependent of the debtor, including vehicles converted for use by the debtor, the debtor’s spouse, or a dependent of the debtor, who has a disability. Conversion of a vehicle for use by a person who has a disability includes altering the interior, installing steering, a wheelchair lift, or motorized steps, or modifying the operation of the vehicle.

(10) The debtor’s right to receive any of the following:

(A) A social security benefit, unemployment compensation, or a local public assistance benefit.

(B) A veterans’ benefit.

(C) A disability, illness, or unemployment benefit.

(D) Alimony, support, or separate maintenance, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor.

(E) A payment under a stock bonus, pension, profit-sharing, annuity, or similar plan or contract on account of illness, disability, death, age, or length of service, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor, unless all of the following apply:

(i) That plan or contract was established by or under the auspices of an insider that employed the debtor at the time the debtor’s rights under the plan or contract arose.

(ii) The payment is on account of
 age or length of service.

(iii) That plan or contract does not qualify under Section 401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, or 408A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
